Colorado statutes. TITLE 9 Safety - Industrial and Commercial
ARTICLE 10
VENTILATION OF GARAGES AND SHOPS

9-10-101 to 9-10-105. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article repealed, p. 554, § 3, effective April 24.

Editor's note:

This article was numbered as article 17 of chapter 13, C.R.S. 1963. For amendments to this article prior to its repeal in 1996, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.